Arkansas, session 2025, SB543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2706(d)(1), concerning the
characteristics and duties of a risk-based provider organization under the
Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section,
reimbursement rates paid by a risk-based provider organization to direct
service providers shall:
(A) Be determined by mutual agreement of the risk-based
provider organization and direct service provider without regard to Medicaid
provider rates established by the Department of Human Services if the
reimbursement rates are not less than the minimum rates established under §
20-77-2709; and
(B) Assure efficiency, economy, quality, and equal access
to enrollable Medicaid beneficiary populations in the same manner as to
individuals who are not covered by the Arkansas Medicaid Program.

*JMB475*
03/20/2025 3:06:36 PM JMB475

SB543
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2706(e)(1), concerning the
characteristics and duties of a risk-based provider organization under the
Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, all
policies and procedures regarding the provision of healthcare services by a
direct service provider shall:
(A) Be determined by mutual agreement of the risk-based
provider organization and the direct service provider without regard to
Medicaid provider rates established by the Department of Human Services if
the reimbursement rates are not less than the minimum rates established under
§ 20-77-2709; and
(B) Assure efficiency, economy, quality, and equal access
to the enrollable Medicaid beneficiary population in the same manner as
individuals who are not covered by the Arkansas Medicaid Program.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 27, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-2709. Home- and community-based services — Rate setting.
(a)(1) An allowance within the capitation rates for a risk-based
provider organization shall not be less than the amount needed to pay
providers the rates arrived at through a rate study to be completed by
October 1, 2025.
(2) The rates from a rate study as described in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section serve as the minimums that risk-based provider
organizations may pay for home- and community-based services, as authorized
in 42 C.F.R. § 438.6, as existing on January 1, 2025.
(b) The rate study under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall:
(1) Cover services in the Community and Employment Support
1915(c) waiver and the Community Support System Provider program; and
(2) Accurately capture provider costs and other relevant
considerations that promote economy, efficiency, quality of care, and equal
access as required by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services under 42
U.S.C. § 1396a, as existing on January 1, 2025, and in federal regulations
under 42 C.F.R. Part 447, as existing on January 1, 2025.
(c)(1) The Department of Human Services shall develop the cost factors
and other criteria for the rate study with input from home- and community-
03/20/2025 3:06:36 PM JMB475

SB543
based service providers.
(2) As no rate study for home- and community-based service
providers has been conducted since the risk-based provider organizations
began serving the state, if the outcome of the rate study under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section produces an increase greater than ten percent (10%),
the department may be phase in a rate increase across two (2) years as
authorized by state appropriations and budgets.
(3) The department shall conduct a full provider rate review in
accordance with the published rate review schedule to ensure that rates
remain adequate and aligned with actual costs.


























03/20/2025 3:06:36 PM JMB475